Nevada, session 83, SB354.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 689A.0437 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0437 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the insurer;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
insurer for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal
to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the insurer for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. An insurer shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
-
*SB354_R1*

– 3 –
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. NRS 689B.0312 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.0312 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the insurer;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
-
*SB354_R1*

– 4 –
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
insurer for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal
to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the insurer for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. An insurer shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
5. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
-
*SB354_R1*

– 5 –
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 3. NRS 689C.1671 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.1671 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the carrier;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the health benefit plan of the
carrier.
2. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the health benefit plan of
the carrier for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate
equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar
services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the carrier for any
-
*SB354_R1*

– 6 –
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. A carrier shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
5. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 4. NRS 695A.1843 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695A.1843 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the benefit coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
-
*SB354_R1*

– 7 –
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the society;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the society.
2. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall
reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
society for the services described in NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal
to the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the society for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. A society shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
5. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
-
*SB354_R1*

– 8 –
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 5. NRS 695B.1924 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.1924 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the hospital or medical services organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy using a drug
to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the hospital
or medical services corporation.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall reimburse:
-
*SB354_R1*

– 9 –
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
hospital or medical services corporation for the services described in
NRS 639.28085 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement
provided to a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the hospital or
medical services corporation for any service to test for, prevent or
treat human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to
the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar
services.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure that
the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
-
*SB354_R1*

– 10 –
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 6. NRS 695C.1743 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.1743 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the health maintenance organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
health maintenance organization for the services described in NRS
639.28085 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization for any service to test for, prevent or treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the
rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar services.
3. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a health
maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
-
*SB354_R1*

– 11 –
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the enrollee is diagnosed.
4. A health maintenance organization that provides health
care services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program or recipients of Medicaid may subject the benefits
required by subsection 1 to step therapy.
5. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
[5.] 6. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[6.] 7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 7. NRS 695G.1705 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695G.1705 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
-
*SB354_R1*

– 12 –
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the managed care organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) The services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided
by a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
2. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization for the services described in NRS
639.28085 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization for any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of
reimbursement provided to a physician for similar services.
3. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques ; [, other than step therapy;]
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A managed care organization that provides health care
services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program or
recipients of Medicaid may subject the benefits required by
subsection 1 to step therapy.
5. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
-
*SB354_R1*

– 13 –
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
[5.] 6. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2024,] 2027, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[6.] 7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8.5. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230,
inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and
695G.415, in the same manner as an insurer that is licensed pursuant
to title 57 of NRS is required to comply with those provisions [.] ,
except that the Board may subject the benefits required by NRS
695G.1705 to step therapy.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
-
*SB354_R1*

– 14 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2027, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB354_R1*